District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-3914

Insolvency.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-192, § 15, 47 DCR 7320
Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 24(a), 52 DCR 1205

History

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section and transition provisions, see § 24 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).

Emergency Legislation